apertium-szl.szl.dix
<pardef n="/iść__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>iść</l>       <r>iść<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idã</l>       <r>iść<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idziesz</l>   <r>iść<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idzie</l>     <r>iść<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idymy</l>     <r>iść<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idziecie</l>  <r>iść<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idōm</l>      <r>iść<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idź</l>       <r>iść<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytej"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>iść<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__szołch"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idōnc</l>     <r>iść<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="BASE__bydōncy"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idōnc</l>     <r>iść<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="w/ziōńć__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ziōńć</l>     <r>ziōńć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eznã</l>      <r>ziōńć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eźniesz</l>   <r>ziōńć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eźnie</l>     <r>ziōńć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eznymy</l>    <r>ziōńć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eźniecie</l>  <r>ziōńć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eznōm</l>     <r>ziōńć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eź</l>        <r>ziōńć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytej"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zi</l>        <r>ziōńć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__żnōnłech"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ziyn</l>      <r>ziōńć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="BASE__żywobycie"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ziyn</l>      <r>ziōńć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__wziynty"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ziynto<b/>było</l><r>ziōńć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="impers"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="b/rać__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>rać</l>       <r>rać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ierã</l>      <r>rać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ieresz</l>    <r>rać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iere</l>      <r>rać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ierymy</l>    <r>rać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ierecie</l>   <r>rać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ierōm</l>     <r>rać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ier</l>       <r>rać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytej"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>r</l>         <r>rać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytołch"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ierōnc</l>    <r>rać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="BASE__bydōncy"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ierōnc</l>    <r>rać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ran</l>       <r>rać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__kochany"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ra</l>        <r>rać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="BASE__beranie"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rano<b/>było</l><r>rać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="impers"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="wr/ać__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ać</l>        <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ã</l>         <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>esz</l>       <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ymy</l>       <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ecie</l>      <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rōm</l>       <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ej</l>        <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytej"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytołch"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rōnc</l>      <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="BASE__bydōncy"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rōnc</l>      <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>an</l>        <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__kochany"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="BASE__beranie"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ano<b/>było</l><r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="impers"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ôb/rać__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>rać</l>       <r>rać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ierã</l>      <r>rać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ieresz</l>    <r>rać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iere</l>      <r>rać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ierymy</l>    <r>rać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ierecie</l>   <r>rać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ierōm</l>     <r>rać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ier</l>       <r>rać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytej"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>r</l>         <r>rać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytołch"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ran</l>       <r>rać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__kochany"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ra</l>        <r>rać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="BASE__beranie"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rano<b/>było</l><r>rać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="impers"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="iść">             <i></i><par n="/iść__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="brać">            <i>b</i><par n="b/rać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="nabrać">          <i>nab</i><par n="ôb/rać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="prać">            <i>p</i><par n="b/rać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="powziōńć">        <i>pow</i><par n="w/ziōńć__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="przibrać">        <i>przib</i><par n="ôb/rać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sebrać">          <i>seb</i><par n="ôb/rać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="wziōńć">          <i>w</i><par n="w/ziōńć__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="wrać">            <i>wr</i><par n="wr/ać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="zeprać">          <i>zep</i><par n="ôb/rać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ôbrać">           <i>ôb</i><par n="ôb/rać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ôdebrać">         <i>ôdeb</i><par n="ôb/rać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="zebrać">          <i>zeb</i><par n="ôb/rać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="wybrać">          <i>wyb</i><par n="ôb/rać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="wyprać">          <i>wyp</i><par n="ôb/rać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sprać">           <i>sp</i><par n="ôb/rać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dobrać">          <i>dob</i><par n="ôb/rać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pobrać">          <i>pob</i><par n="ôb/rać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="podebrać">        <i>podeb</i><par n="ôb/rać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="przebrać">        <i>przeb</i><par n="ôb/rać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rozebrać">        <i>rozeb</i><par n="ôb/rać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ubrać">           <i>ub</i><par n="ôb/rać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="zabrać">          <i>zab</i><par n="ôb/rać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="zawziōńć">        <i>zaw</i><par n="w/ziōńć__vblex"/></e>
